Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 6. Reckless and Negligent Driving.

Sec. 28.35.400.
Reckless driving.

A person who drives a motor vehicle in the state in a manner that creates a substantial and unjustifiable risk of harm to a person or to property is guilty of reckless driving. A substantial and unjustifiable risk is a risk of such a nature and degree that the conscious disregard of it or a failure to perceive it constitutes a gross deviation from the standard of conduct that a reasonable person would observe in the situation.

A person convicted of reckless driving is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000 or by imprisonment for not more than one year or by both.

Lawfully conducted automobile, snowmobile, motorcycle, or other motor vehicle racing or exhibition events are not subject to the provisions of this section.

History.

(§ 50-5-4 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 182 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 1961; am § 2 ch 121 SLA 1967; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 1971; am § 46 ch 32 SLA 1971; am § 6 ch 74 SLA 1974)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS

28.35.040

.
Renumbered in 2006.

Sec. 28.35.410.
Negligent driving.

A person who drives a motor vehicle in the state in a manner that creates an unjustifiable risk of harm to a person or to property and who, as a result of the creation of the risk, actually endangers a person or property is guilty of negligent driving. An unjustifiable risk is a risk of such a nature and degree that a failure to avoid it constitutes a deviation from the standard of care that a reasonable person would observe in the situation. Proof that a defendant actually endangered a person or property is established by showing that, as a result of the defendant’s driving,

an accident occurred;

a person, including the defendant, took evasive action to avoid an accident;

a person, including the defendant, stopped or slowed down suddenly to avoid an accident; or

a person or property, including the defendant or the defendant’s property, was otherwise endangered.

The offense of negligent driving is a lesser offense than, and included in, the offense of reckless driving, and a person charged with reckless driving may be convicted of the lesser offense of negligent driving.

A person convicted of negligent driving is guilty of an infraction as provided under AS

28.90.010

.

Lawfully conducted automobile, snowmobile, motorcycle or other motor vehicle racing or exhibition events are not subject to the provisions of this section.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1974; am § 6 ch 241 SLA 1976; am § 19 ch 144 SLA 1977; am § 43 ch 21 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

28.35.045

.
Renumbered in 2006. In 2006, in (c) of this section, “AS

28.90.010

” was substituted for “AS

28.40.050

” to reflect the 2006 renumbering of AS

28.40.050

.